Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 3 Lobbyists
3-6-306. Penalties.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary:

The ethics commission may administratively assess a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day up to a maximum of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) if an employer of a lobbyist:

Fails, without good cause, to timely register or to timely update, correct or otherwise modify the employer's registration statement;

Fails, without good cause, to timely pay registration fees;

Fails, without good cause, to timely file the employer disclosure report;

The ethics commission may administratively assess a civil penalty, not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), if an employer of a lobbyist:

Files information with the commission knowing or having reason to know that the information is inaccurate or incomplete;

Utilizes the services of a lobbyist knowing or having reason to know that the lobbyist has not registered or that the lobbyist's registration has expired without renewal or has been rejected, suspended or revoked by the ethics commission; or

Knowingly violates § 3-6-304 or § 3-6-305; provided, that for an initial violation of § 3-6-305, the commission may only assess a civil penalty up to two hundred percent (200%) of the value of any gift or twenty-five dollars ($25.00), whichever is greater;

The ethics commission may administratively assess a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day up to a maximum of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) if a lobbyist:

Fails, without good cause, to timely register or to timely update, correct or otherwise modify the lobbyist's registration statement; or

Fails, without good cause, to timely pay a registration fee;

The ethics commission may administratively assess a civil penalty, not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), if a lobbyist:

Files information with the commission knowing or having reason to know that the information is inaccurate or incomplete;

Engages in lobbying on behalf of an employer knowing or having reason to know that the employer has not registered or that the lobbyist's registration has expired without renewal or has been rejected, suspended or revoked by the ethics commission; or

Knowingly violates § 3-6-304 or § 3-6-305; provided, that, for an initial violation of § 3-6-305, the commission may only assess a civil penalty up to two hundred percent (200%) of the value of any gift or twenty-five dollars ($25.00), whichever is greater; and

The ethics commission may administratively assess a civil penalty, not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), if any candidate for public office, official in the legislative or executive branch, or an immediate family member of the candidate or official knowingly violates § 3-6-304 or § 3-6-305; provided, that, for an initial violation of § 3-6-305, the commission may only assess a civil penalty up to two hundred percent (200%) of the value of any gift or twenty-five dollars ($25.00), whichever is greater. Additionally, if the commission determines that an egregious violation of either § 3-6-304 or § 3-6-305 has been committed by a member of the general assembly, then it may report its findings and actions to the ethics committee of the appropriate house of the general assembly.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(3)(A), no civil penalty shall be imposed by the ethics commission on any staff person or employee of the general assembly or any employee of any executive department or agency or other state body in the executive branch for a violation of this part. The ethics commission shall instead refer the commission's findings and recommendations for appropriate action to the speakers of the senate and of the house of representatives, if the person is a staff person or employee of the general assembly and to the appropriate executive official with supervisory authority over that person if the person is an employee of any executive department or agency or other state body in the executive branch.

As used in subdivision (a)(3)(B)(i), “staff person” and “employee” shall not be construed to include any person holding any office or position enumerated in § 8-50-501(a).

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the ethics commission may administratively place on probationary status, suspend, reject, or revoke the registration of any lobbyist who knowingly and persistently violates this part. As used in this subsection (b), “persistently” means three (3) or more occasions during a two-year period of any general assembly.

On its Internet site, the ethics commission shall promptly post the names of all employers and lobbyists who are:

Delinquent in filing registration, registration statements or amendments thereto;

Delinquent in filing disclosure reports;

Delinquent in paying registration fees or civil penalties; or

Found to have committed any other violation of this part.

Additionally, the commission shall post the names of all lobbyists having expired, probationary, suspended, rejected, or revoked registration. The commission shall also post the names of any other person found to have knowingly violated § 3-6-304 or § 3-6-305.

An intentional violation of this part constitutes a criminal offense and is punishable as a Class C misdemeanor for the first offense, as a Class B misdemeanor for the second offense, and as a Class A misdemeanor for the third and subsequent offenses.

In the chancery court of Davidson County, the ethics commission may seek injunctive relief to prevent any employer of a lobbyist, lobbyist, candidate for public office, official in the legislative or executive branch, or the immediate family of the candidate or official from engaging in any continuing violation of this part.

It is a Class B misdemeanor for any person to file with the ethics commission a sworn complaint, alleging a violation of this part, that is known to be false.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 35; 2007, ch. 322, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Penalties for Class A, B, and C misdemeanors, §40-35-111.

3-6-307. Exemption of lobbying activities when paid only out-of-pocket personal expenses.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, if a person receives as compensation for lobbying only reimbursement for actual out-of-pocket personal expenses, and if the person receives reimbursement for ten (10) days or less per year, then the person is not a lobbyist for purposes of this chapter or § 67-4-1702(a)(1).

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, if a person receives as compensation for lobbying only reimbursement for actual out-of-pocket personal expenses, and if the person receives the reimbursement for more than ten (10) days per year, then the person shall register as a lobbyist and shall comply with all lobbyist requirements imposed pursuant to this chapter; provided, however, that the commission shall waive the person's registration fee and the person shall be exempt from payment of the occupational privilege tax on lobbyists imposed by § 67-4-1702(a)(1).

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, if an individual or entity employs, retains or otherwise arranges for one or more persons to engage in lobbying for compensation, and if the only compensation paid is reimbursement for actual out-of-pocket personal expenses, and if the reimbursement is not paid for more than ten (10) days per person per year, then the individual or entity is not an employer of a lobbyist for purposes of this chapter.

For purposes of this section, the term “out-of-pocket personal expenses” includes such things as the lobbyist registration fee, legislative information services material, copying expenses, transportation costs, parking fees, and personal lodging and food expenses incurred while actually engaging in lobbying. Reimbursement for transportation, parking, personal lodging and food costs shall be limited to expenses allowed for those items in the comprehensive state travel regulations. No such reimbursed expenses shall be for the benefit of any public official, except for informational materials delivered to public officials.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 35; 2008, ch. 1182, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Acts 2008, ch. 1182, § 7 provided that § 1 of the act, which amended subsection (b), shall apply from the 2009 registration year forward.

3-6-308. Administration and enforcement — Duties of ethics commission — Duties of attorney general — Confidentiality.

This part shall be administered and enforced by the ethics commission. To that end, it is the duty of the ethics commission to:

Develop, with the advice, assistance and approval of the division of strategic technology solutions, and prescribe electronic forms for registration, registration statements, amendments to registration statements, disclosure reports and other information required to be reported pursuant to this part;

Preserve the registration, registration statements, amendments to registration statements, disclosure reports and other filed information for a period of at least five (5) years, or longer when there is a pending investigation by the commission or any law enforcement agency, or when there is an ongoing administrative or judicial proceeding related to any registration, statements, amendments, reports or information;

Develop a filing, coding and cross-indexing system consonant with the purposes of this part;

Issue and publish, upon proper request from any employer, lobbyist or public official subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, advisory opinions concerning the requirements of this part; however, under no circumstances shall a person performing staff duties as an employee of the commission have the authority to issue an advisory opinion, informal or otherwise, except as provided in § 3-6-117, concerning the authority of a person performing staff duties as the executive director or an attorney to give informal responses in the manner described in § 3-6-117;

Accept the electronic filing of any pertinent information voluntarily supplied that exceeds the requirements of this part;

Review electronic filings submitted pursuant to this part to ensure compliance with the laws administered and enforced by the ethics commission. Filings older than two (2) years shall be deemed to be sufficient, absent a showing of fraud;

Audit each year the registration statements, amendments to registration statements and reports of no more than four percent (4%) of all lobbyists. The attorney general and reporter, or the attorney general's designee, shall attend the random selection proceeding in order to preserve the integrity of the proceeding. Nothing contained within this subdivision (a)(7) shall be construed to prevent the commission, upon finding probable cause to believe that an employer or a lobbyist has violated this part, from auditing the registration statements, amendments to registration statements and reports of the employer or lobbyist;

Compile and publish, on the commission's Internet site, the following reports listing:

All registered employers, alphabetically;

All registered lobbyists, alphabetically; and

Each subject matter category specified by the ethics commission for purposes of § 3-6-302(b)(2)(C), with each lobbyist listed under the subject matter category who lobbied that subject matter category during the registration year;

The ethics commission may prepare and publish on its web site such other reports as are deemed to be appropriate and in the public interest; and

Impose civil penalties and other administrative sanctions in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

It is the duty of the attorney general and reporter to render opinions and give counsel to the ethics commission upon request of the executive director.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, random audit information and investigatory audit information shall be confidential and shall be maintained as such by the members and employees of the ethics commission and by the officers and employees of the state, in the manner and to the extent that the confidentiality of tax information is maintained by the officers and employees of the department of revenue and the state under title 67, chapter 1, part 17.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 35; 2008, ch. 697, § 4; 2008, ch. 1182, §§ 5, 6; 2009, ch. 556, § 24; 2020, ch. 690, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “division of strategic technology solutions” for “office of information resources”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 690, § 22, June 11, 2020.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Bureau of ethics and campaign finance, title 4, ch. 55.

Attorney General Opinions. Confidentiality of audit information obtained by the ethics commission. OAG 13-88, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 87 (11/6/13).

3-6-309. Registration of person in default on student loans.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Tennessee ethics commission or other governmental body authorized by statute to register lobbyists;

“Guarantee agency” means a guarantor of student loans that has an agreement with the United States secretary of education; and

“TSAC” means the Tennessee student assistance corporation.

Upon receiving a copy of a final order as provided in subsection (c) from TSAC or a guarantee agency, the commission shall suspend, deny or revoke the registration of any individual lobbyist who has defaulted on a repayment or service obligation under any federal family education loan program, the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, compiled in 20 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq., a student loan guaranteed or administered by TSAC, or any other state or federal educational loan or service-conditional scholarship program.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1), the commission may elect not to suspend, deny, or revoke the registration of a lobbyist if the commission determines that the default or delinquency is the result of a medical hardship that prevented the person from working in the person's licensed field and the medical hardship significantly contributed to the default or delinquency.

The commission shall accept any determination of default from TSAC or a guarantee agency, after TSAC or the guarantee agency has afforded a debtor an opportunity to be heard in accordance with subdivision (c)(2); and the commission shall rescind any disciplinary action and restore any registration upon receiving notice from TSAC or the guarantee agency that the individual has agreed to serve the individual's obligation or is in compliance with an approved repayment plan.

Unless a debtor has made satisfactory arrangements according to the lender, TSAC or the guarantee agency, which may include administrative wage garnishment, voluntary payment arrangements, deferment or forbearance, then the debtor shall be regarded as delinquent or in default. If a debtor is delinquent or in default on a repayment or service obligation under a guaranteed student loan identified in subsection (b), or the debtor has failed to enter into a payment plan, agree to a service obligation or comply with a payment plan previously approved by TSAC or the guarantee agency, then TSAC or the guarantee agency shall issue to the debtor a notice of intent to file an order with the appropriate licensing authority to seek to suspend, deny or revoke the debtor's registration. The notice shall:

Be served upon the debtor personally or by certified mail with return receipt requested; and

State that the debtor's registration shall be suspended, denied or revoked ninety (90) days after service unless within that time the debtor:

Pays the entire debt stated in the notice;

Enters into a payment plan, service obligation or complies with a payment plan previously entered into and approved by TSAC or the guarantee agency;

Requests and qualifies for deferment, forbearance or other satisfactory compliance; or

Requests a hearing before TSAC or the guarantee agency.

The hearing request by the debtor shall be made in writing and must be received by TSAC or the guarantee agency within twenty (20) days of the date the notice is served.

TSAC or the guarantee agency, upon receipt of a request for a hearing from the debtor, shall schedule a hearing to determine whether a determination of delinquency or default which could result in suspension, denial or revocation of the debtor's registration is appropriate. The debtor's registration may not be suspended, denied or revoked until a determination is reached following the hearing. The issues that may be determined in the hearing are:

The amount of the debt, if any;

Whether the debtor is delinquent or in default; and

Whether the debtor:

Has entered into a payment plan or service obligation approved by TSAC or the guarantee agency;

Is willing to enter into a payment plan or service obligation approved by TSAC or the guarantee agency;

Is willing to comply with a payment plan or service obligation previously entered into and approved by TSAC or the guarantee agency;

Whether the debtor is eligible for deferment, forbearance or other satisfactory compliance; or

Whether the debtor's default or delinquency is the result of a medical hardship that prevented the debtor from working in the person's licensed field and the medical hardship significantly contributed to the default or delinquency.

If a debtor, without good cause, fails to respond to the notice of intent, fails to timely request a hearing, or fails to appear at a regularly scheduled hearing, the debtor's defenses, objections, or request for a payment plan or compliance with a payment plan may be determined to be without merit; and TSAC or the guarantee agency shall enter a final decision and order, requesting suspension, denial or revocation of the debtor's registration, and further requesting the commission to order the debtor to refrain from engaging in lobbying. TSAC or the guarantee agency shall send a copy of the order to the commission and the debtor.

The administrative hearings shall be conducted in accordance with rules and regulations adopted under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

When TSAC or the guarantee agency determines that the debt is paid in full or the debtor has entered into a payment plan, entered into a service obligation, is otherwise in satisfactory compliance or complied with a payment plan previously approved by TSAC or the guarantee agency, TSAC or the guarantee agency shall enter an order requesting that the commission terminate the order suspending, denying or revoking the registration. TSAC or the guarantee agency shall send a copy of the order to the commission and the debtor. Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, when the registration is reinstated, the commission shall not impose a reinstatement fee that exceeds fifty dollars ($50.00).

Entry of an order seeking to terminate suspension, denial or revocation of a registration does not limit the ability of TSAC or the guarantee agency to issue a new order which seeks to suspend, deny or revoke the registration of the same debtor in the event of another delinquency or default.

TSAC is authorized to promulgate necessary rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this subsection (c). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

The commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Acts 2012, ch. 519, § 4; 2018, ch. 744, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (b)(2) and (c)(2)(C)(v).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 744, § 13. January 1, 2019; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect April 18, 2018.